Maryland, session 2025, HB1460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–212.2.
A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY NOT REQUIRE A BIDDER OR OFFEROR, AS A
CONDITION TO SUBMITTING A BID OR PROPOSAL ON A STATE PROCUREMENT, TO
CERTIFY THAT THE BIDDER OR OFFEROR, EXCEPT AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE OR UNDER FEDERAL LAW:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY; OR
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY FOR
THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1460*

HOUSE BILL 1460
13–228.
A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY NOT INCLUDE IN A STATE PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT, OR RENEWAL OF A CONTRACT, A CLAUSE REQUIRING THE CONTRACTOR
TO CERTIFY THAT THE CONTRACTOR, EXCEPT AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS ARTICLE
OR UNDER FEDERAL LAW:
(1) IS NOT ENGAGING IN A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY; OR
(2) WILL REFRAIN FROM A BOYCOTT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY FOR
THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.